District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2311

Financial transactions and accounts; annual report to the Secretary of Education.

Repealed.

June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 266, ch. 324, § 7
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1811.
1973 Ed., § 31-1031.